Massachusetts, session 194th, H2745.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Hampden
County regional retirement system, hereinafter referred to in this act as “the system”, shall be
governed by administrators, hereinafter referred to in this act as “administrators”, and a board of
directors, hereinafter referred to in this act as “the board”.
(A) The administrators of the Hampden County regional retirement system shall be
comprised of one individual appointed by the chief elected official or governing body of each
member agency of the Hampden County regional retirement board (Mayor, Select Board, School
Committee, Board of Directors, Town Council). Administrators from communities must be
elected or appointed town officials. Administrators from fire and water districts must be a full-
of 6

time employee of that agency. Administrators from all other retirement member agencies
(including regional school districts, veteran’s service districts, emergency dispatch services and
regional retirement boards) shall be an elected or appointed official of that organization. None of
these administrators need be participants in the Hampden County regional retirement system.
(1) The administrators of the Hampden County regional retirement system shall meet no
less than two times per fiscal year. Their meeting shall be governed by the Open Meeting Law
requirements of the commonwealth of Massachusetts.
(2) It shall be the responsibility of the administrators to:
(a) Elect three of the seven members of the board as described in section B(2)(b),
B(2)(c) and B(2)(d)
(b) Approve by a 2/3 vote, changes to the bylaws of the Hampden County retirement
board as described in section 2.
(3) Administrators shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing authority and their
appointment shall be renewed annually. There is no limit to the terms for which an administrator
may serve.
(B) The board of the Hampden County regional retirement system shall consist of seven
members, six of whom are elected and one of whom is appointed.
(1) It shall be the responsibility of the board to:
(a) Hire and oversee the system administrator or director
(b) Approve the budget and operations of the system
of 6

(c) Oversee the operations and administration of the system
(2) Six members of the board shall be elected as follows:
(a) Three members of the board shall be elected at large by a majority of the
members of the Hampden County regional retirement system. Both active and retired members
shall be eligible to vote for these board members. Each of these 3 members' terms shall expire in
a different year; The election of these board members will be supervised by the board and staff
of the Hampden County regional retirement board with the vote totals posted on the system’s
website.
(b) One member shall be elected from and by the administrators who represent
member community agencies. This representative shall be one of the community administrators.
This individual need not be a member of the Hampden County regional retirement system.
(c) One member shall be elected from and by the administrators who represent the
housing authorities and fire and water districts agencies. The elected individual need not be a
member of the Hampden County regional retirement system; and
(d) One member shall be elected from and by the administrators who represent all
other Hampden County regional retirement member agencies including regional school districts,
veteran's service districts, emergency dispatch services and regional retirement boards. The
elected individual need not be a member of the Hampden County regional retirement system.
(e) The election of each of the three administrators in sections (B)(2)(a), (B)(2)(b)
and (B)(2)(c) shall be conducted by roll-call vote, and the record of each election, including vote
totals, shall be reported back to the agencies’ chief elected official or body.
of 6

(3) One member of the board shall be appointed by the treasurers of the system member
agencies. This member shall serve for a 3-year term. The selection of this board member shall
be supervised by the treasurers.
(4) A board member may serve no more than three consecutive terms.
(5) The terms of the 7 board members shall be staggered so that 2 members are elected
in 2 consecutive years and 3 members are elected in the third year.
(6) Every 2 years, the board by majority vote shall elect 1 of its members to serve as
chair of the board.
(7) Board members shall be 7 distinct individuals and no more than 2 members of the
board shall be affiliated with the same member agency of the Hampden County regional
retirement system.
SECTION 2. The board shall create, or direct to be created, by-laws of the organization.
The by-laws shall include, but not be limited to the organizational structure, voting and election
procedures, including a procedure for the filling of board vacancies, the role of the treasurers'
advisory board, investment policies, frequency and responsibility for agency financial reporting
and audits, committee and subcommittee structure as well as other policies and procedures of the
organization.
The by-laws of the Hampden County regional retirement board shall take effect when
ratified by a vote of 2/3 of the administrators. Subsequent revisions to the by-laws shall also
require a 2/3 approval vote of the administrators. All such votes require a publicly recorded vote
of the agency governing body.
of 6

SECTION 3. (a) Elections of board members as described in section 1B shall be
completed within 120 days following the passage of this act.
(b) The term of office for all persons serving as members of the board of the Hampden
county regional retirement system at the time of passage of this act shall end on the earlier date
of 120 days following the passage of this act or upon the election of the board as proscribed in
section 1.
(c) For the 6 members initially elected to the board as described in sections B(2)(a),
B(2)(b), B(2)(c) and B(2)(d), initial terms shall be staggered as follows:
(i) For the three members elected by the members (Section B(2)(a)) one member shall
serve for 1 year, one member for 2 years, and one member for 3 years.
(ii) The member elected through Section B(2)(b) shall serve an initial term of 1 year
(iii) The member elected through Section B(2)(c) shall serve an initial term of 2 years
(iv) The member elected through Section B(2)(d) shall serve an initial term of 3 years
(d) The board member appointed by the treasurers of the system shall serve a 3-year term.
(e) Subsequent terms for all elected board members shall be three years in duration.
(f) All board terms shall expire at the end of the state fiscal year so the first terms of all
elected officials may be less than a full 1, 2 or 3 years.
(g) The initial draft of by-laws for the Hampden county regional retirement board shall be
presented to the administrators for ratification within 180 days of the formation of the 7-member
board of directors. Agency operations may be conducted under these by-laws on an interim basis
of 6

following their presentation to the administrators. Ratified by-laws shall be in place within 270
days of the formation of the 7-member board of directors.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 6